District of Columbia statutes.
31-3311.08

Annual report and recommendations.

On June 1, 2011, and every year thereafter, the Commissioner shall report to the Council any significant National Association of Insurance Commissioners adoptions related to health care reform, including medical loss ratios and loss ratio disclosure, and any recommendations if the District law differs.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-360, § 109, 58 DCR 896